Alabama, session 2026rs, SB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 31-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§31-9-4
(a) There is hereby created within the executive branch
of the state government a department of emergency management,
hereinafter called the "Emergency Management Agency," with a
Director of Emergency Management, hereinafter called the
"director," who shall be the head thereof. The director shall
be appointed by the Governor. The director shall devote his or
her entire time to the duties of the office of director shall
be a full-time position. The director shall not hold another
office under the government of the United States or any other
state, or of this state, or any political subdivision thereof,
during his or her incumbency in suchtenure in the office, and
shall not hold any position of trust or profit, or engage in
any occupation or business the conduct of which shallthat
would interfere or be inconsistent with the duties of Director
Page 1

would interfere or be inconsistent with the duties of Director
SB8 Enrolled
of Emergency Management under the provisions of this article.
The director shall hold office duringserve at the pleasure of
the Governor.
(b)(1) The director may employ, subject to the
provisions of the Merit System ActArticle 1, Chapter 26, Title
36, such technical, clerical, stenographic, and otherall
necessary personnel and may make such expendituresexpend
within the appropriation therefor, or from other funds made
available to him or her for purposes of emergency management,
as may bethe funds necessary to carry out the purposes of this
article; provided, that the state shall not pay the
compensation, if any, of block wardens, fire guards, first aid
specialists, auxiliary firemen, auxiliary policemen, and
similar emergency management personnel, nor shall it pay the
compensation of personnel employed by or for a local
organization for emergency management.
(2) The director's authority pursuant to this
subsection includes the use of appropriated funds to purchase
items that are reasonably necessary to promote the functions
assigned to the Emergency Management Agency by this article,
including materials to educate the public on emergency
preparedness.
(c) The director and other personnel of the Emergency
Management Agency shall be provided with appropriate office
space, furniture, equipment, supplies, stationery, and
printing in the same manner as provided for personnel of other
state agencies.
(d) The director, subject to the direction and control
Page 2

(d) The director, subject to the direction and control
SB8 Enrolled
of the Governor, shall be the executive head of the Emergency
Management Agency and shall be responsible to the Governor for
carrying out the program for emergency management of this
state. The director shall coordinate the activities of all
organizations of emergency management within the state, and
shall maintain liaison with and; cooperate with major
commanders of the armed forces within the state, the Alabama
State Law Enforcement Agency, the State Military Department,
and with emergency management agencies and organizations of
other states and of the federal government,; and shall have
such additional authority, duties, and responsibilities
authorized by this article as may be prescribed by the
Governor.
(e) The director shall also hold the position of
Assistant Director of Homeland Security for Emergency
Preparedness and Response."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB8 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB8
Senate 22-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.



100
101 House of Representatives
102 Passed: 11-Mar-26
103
104
105
106
107 By: Senator Allen
Page 4